Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 9 Urban Renewal

Cross references. —

As to housing generally, see §

15-10-101

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment § 1 et seq.

29A C.J.S. Eminent Domain § 64(1).